trunk/resultats/catalan.dic
abissini/LVY
acantopterigi/LVY
acatalanat/BVY
acidogen/KVY
acinètic/FVY
adjurat/BVY
adober/FVY
adulatori/KVY
aftós/JVY
agafador/EFVY
agarrat/BVY
agustí/HVY
alabès/JVY
alcorí/HVY
alecític/FVY
algerí/HVY
alienat/BVY
al·logen/KVY
al·lèlic/FVY
amarantí/HVY
ambiciós/JVY
amoïnadís/BVY
amònic/FVY
anacardí/HVY
anacrogin/KVY
anestèsic/FVY
anguillà/HVY
annex/JVY
antifònic/FVY
antillà/HVY
antireglamentari/KVY
antròpic/FVY
apesarat/BVY
apocrí/HVY
apol·lini/LVY
aprofitador/FVY
aquós/JVY
arbitrari/KVY
argentí/GHVY
arpegiat/BVY
arqueter/FVY
arrapós/JVY
asiní/HVY
aspiratori/KVY
assegurador/FVY
assemblat/BVY
atàxic/FVY
atès/JVY
aurificat/BVY
australià/HVY
autoimmunitari/KVY
avorrívol/FVY
banyalbufarí/H
barbafresc/F
barbagrís/J
barrejat/B
beduí/H
bel·licós/J
benemèrit/F
benjamí/H
bibliotecari/K
birmà/H
bitini/L
blanquinós/J
blasfemat/B
bocafí/H
borreguer/F
botswanès/J
brevilini/L
bronzat/B
bru/H
bulliciós/J
caganer/F
calcari/K
calimós/J
canonejat/B
caní/H
canós/J
cariogen/K
carmenador/F
cartilaginós/J
casolà/H
catalanejat/B
ceroferari/K
cerví/H
cimós/J
cinegètic/F
clementí/H
coacervat/B
coccigi/L
coccini/L
codolós/J
columnari/K
comissari/K
compaginador/F
complectiu/B
compromissari/K
concussionari/K
confós/J
conrat/B
consanguini/L
conservatori/K
contrari/K
copatró/H
copel·lat/B
copiós/J
corder/EF
coronari/K
cromós/J
cubà/H
cucat/BE
cunicultor/F
curvilini/L
daci/K
delegatori/K
delejat/B
delerós/J
deprecatori/K
desamat/B
desballestador/F
descalç/J
descamisat/B
desembarcat/B
desencapsat/B
desenllotat/B
desganat/B
desnierat/B
desterrat/B
destinatari/K
desè/H
diastomàtic/F
difós/J
dinerari/K
directiu/B
domiciliari/K
donador/F
dretà/H
eburnat/BVY
edematós/JVY
eleusini/LVY
embegut/BVY
embenador/FVY
emigratori/KVY
emmorterat/BVY
empouat/BVY
encepegat/BVY
enervat/BVY
enfadós/JVY
engolat/BVY
engorronidor/FVY
enrarit/BVY
enterrossat/BVY
envermenat/BVY
epicè/HVY
epilatori/KVY
eritematós/JVY
erudit/FVY
esbossat/BVY
escenificat/BVY
escrofulós/JVY
esgavellat/BVY
espatotxí/HVY
espellussat/BVY
esperitós/JVY
esplèndid/FVY
estafat/BVY
estatutari/KVY
esteatopigi/LVY
estomatós/JVY
etilat/BVY
etoli/KVY
etrusc/FVY
exhalatori/KVY
exploratori/KVY
extralimitat/BVY
fabrià/H
fabulós/J
fatigós/J
fatídic/F
ferroviari/K
filipí/H
filós/J
fintat/B
fluid/F
foliaci/K
formós/J
fregit/BE
frigi/L
fructuós/J
frumentari/K
fulmini/DL
funàmbul/F
galanxó/H
gallinaci/K
garrigós/J
gaspat/B
geriàtric/F
germà/GH
glevós/J
granulós/J
gratulatori/K
grofollut/B
guapo/F
guardià/H
hematós/JVY
hereditari/KVY
hidrargíric/FVY
hispanoamericà/HVY
honorari/KVY
hòrrid/FVY
imitatiu/BVY
immens/JVY
immeritori/KVY
implacentari/KVY
importú/HVY
inclòs/JVY
independitzat/BVY
indoari/KVY
indòmit/FVY
inflex/JVY
inspiratori/KVY
instituït/BVY
intracomunitari/KVY
intrús/JVY
isabelí/HVY
isogàmic/FVY
jaculatori/K
joguinós/J
jovenejat/B
jurassià/H
laplacià/H
laudatori/K
laurini/L
les/J
licitatori/K
liquidador/F
llanós/J
lleoní/GH
llepissós/J
longilini/L
macilent/F
maculós/J
magrebí/H
malacopterigi/L
malgustós/J
malmaridat/B
mamari/K
manacorí/H
mans/J
marratxiner/F
masculí/H
melangiós/J
membranaci/K
metamèric/F
metatarsià/H
mil·lenari/K
mixtilini/L
molt/F
monopirè/H
morfit/B
morfogen/K
morrotós/J
musulmà/H
màgic/F
nicè/H
nitrós/J
notori/K
novell/F
nubià/H
ondulós/JVY
oratori/EKVY
orc/EFVY
orellut/BVY
otomà/HVY
panxacontent/F
parlamentari/K
parnassià/H
pegós/J
pentadàctil/F
peregrí/H
personificat/B
petitori/K
piroclàstic/F
pissarrós/J
pluridisciplinari/K
pobrissó/H
polistèmon/F
preciós/J
presbiterià/H
prestat/B
primogènit/F
proditori/K
pujador/EF
quadragenari/K
queixós/J
quinzè/H
raqueter/F
reanimat/B
rectilini/L
reglamentari/K
reivindicat/B
rellentós/J
reorganitzador/F
retardatari/K
revenut/B
rodó/H
rossellonès/J
roter/F
sacrococcigi/L
salernità/H
sanguini/L
sanitari/K
secallós/J
secà/H
segler/F
setaci/K
sexuat/B
shakespearià/H
sinoic/F
sogdià/H
somiós/J
subtilitzador/F
sumari/K
superheterodí/H
supuratiu/B
talentós/J
tauler/EF
tebà/H
ternari/K
timorat/F
torinès/J
torredà/H
tranuitat/B
trifil·le/F
tripolità/H
tumultuari/K
ucraïnès/JVY
univalve/FVY
urbà/HVY
vegetarià/H
venós/J
versejat/B
versiculari/K
vilà/H
visurador/F
volvós/J
vulturí/H
àpter/FVY
